Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1504
Acquisition by lease; election unnecessary.

It shall not be necessary, in order to acquire the necessary land for an aviation field by lease, to submit the proposition of such acquisition by lease to the legal voters of such city or village.

Laws 1943, c. 39, § 1(4), p. 183;

R.S.1943, § 19-803.01;

Laws 1947, c. 53, § 4, p. 182.